Washington statutes.
RCW 19.405.160

Declaratory order.

(1) An investor-owned utility may petition the commission for a declaratory order pursuant to RCW 34.05.240 to determine whether a proposed energy transformation project, nonemitting electric generation project, or renewable resource project meets the requirements of RCW 19.405.040 (1) through (3) and 19.405.050 (1) and (5).

(2) The petition for a declaratory order must be in writing and must include information that accurately describes the proposed project.

(3) A project that the commission has determined under this section to comply with the requirements of RCW 19.405.040 (1) through (3) or 19.405.050 (1) and (5) may be identified in an investor-owned utility's clean energy action plan under RCW 19.280.030(2) and the utility's clean energy implementation plan under RCW 19.405.060(1).

(4) If an investor-owned utility seeks approval of a resource or project in a clean energy implementation plan under RCW 19.405.060, or in a proceeding to set rates, that the commission has previously determined under this section complies with the requirements of RCW 19.405.040 (1) through (3) or 19.405.050 (1) and (5) and the resource or project deviates substantively from the one described in the commission's determination in a manner that affects the resource's or project's potential compliance with RCW 19.405.040 (1) through (3) or 19.405.050 (1) and (5), the commission may reevaluate the resource or project to determine if it complies.

[ 2022 c 92 s 1.]